src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BOHCCO !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped: PxV2 ;
 +SgGenCmp: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCU !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Ped:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:jdasa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Ped:jd%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON VUDDJI- !!= * __@CODE@__
 BOHCCOadj ;
 BOHCCUadj ;

LEXICON BOHCCOadj !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +SgGenCmp: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: PxV2 ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCUadj !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:jdasa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:jd%> PxPlComC ;






!! !!!Adjective declension
! - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ATTR  !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the normal lexicon for ATTR forms
+Attr:         K ;                  ! Plain attributive
+Attr:         Rreal ;
+Attr+Use/NG+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ; ! ! Nielsen p. 212: vuottâ føiet til _nominativ_formen av adjektiver
! -:#%- ProperNoun ;   !Already i LEXICON R   !^C^
+AttrCmp+Use/-Spell:» NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.
! #+Use/-Spell:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.
+AttrCmp#+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ; ! both comp and independent adj ! 

LEXICON ATTRCONT  !!= * __@CODE@__  This lexicon is for forms with non-sub Attr, where we sub the rest.
 +Attr:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Use/Sub: Rreal ;    
 +Use/Sub+Use/-Spell:» NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj, not compound
! #+Use/Sub+Use/-Spell:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
 #+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj




LEXICON LAIKI0     !!= * __@CODE@__  Directing adjectives ...
 DEVNVCASE ;      ! ... to bisyllabic nominal declension
+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON JOHTOLAT
! +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#geahtes K ; !This is not right
 @C.NeedNoun@ HEANDARAT-COMM ;
! The flag is there because verbs are derived via +Der/us suffix to
! JOHTOLAT, and then pick up their +N tag in HEANDARAT-COMM, but not
! via +Der/geahtes.

LEXICON JOHTOLAT0 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +SgNomCmp:%> R ;			! test this
 +SgGenCmp:%> R ;
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%> K ;
! This must be a typo!


LEXICON JOHTOLAHKA- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> Px3V ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Ped:n%> PxC ;
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Use/Sub: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +SgGenCmp+Use/Sub:X4 R ; ! !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ;
 +Use/Sub:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Use/Sub:X8 GOADE- ; !  ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON ISSORASSA2-
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 +Use/NG:X4 BU/MUS ;  
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON ISSORASSA- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 :X4 BU/MUS ;  
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS !!= * __@CODE@__
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 
LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG+Dial/%-KJ:eb'bo EABBU ; 
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS ; !  
 +Superl+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG+Dial/%-KJ:emos EAMOS ; !  
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS ; ! 
 +Superl+Use/Sub:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_NVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  
 +Comp+Use/Sub+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS_NVD ; ! 
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS_NVD ; ! 
 +Superl+Use/Sub:eapmus EAMOS_NVD ;


LEXICON EAMOS_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives



LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp:at SHORTCOMP ; !  
! +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP ; !  !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
! +Comp+Use/NG:et SHORTCOMP ; !   
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; !  !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
! +Comp+Use/Sub+Use/NG:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
! +Comp+Use/NG:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  ! OBS
 +Comp+Use/Sub:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl:amos EAMOS ; ! 
! +Superl+Use/NG:eapmo7s EAMOS ;
! +Superl+Use/Sub:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Use/Sub: Rreal ;    
